Missouri, session 2026, SB1530.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 387, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 387.435, to read as
follows:
387.435. A TNC shall not be vicariously liable under
any law by reason of owning, operating, or maintaining the
digital network accessed by a TNC driver or rider, or by
being the TNC affiliated with a TNC driver, for harm to
persons or property that results or arises out of the use,
operation, or possession of a motor vehicle operating as a
TNC vehicle while the driver is logged on to the digital
network if:
(1) There is no negligence under sections 387.400 to
387.440 or criminal wrongdoing under the federal or Missouri
criminal code on the part of the TNC; and
(2) The TNC has fulfilled all of its obligations under
sections 387.400 to 387.440 with respect to the TNC driver.
✓